District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-381.08

Antifraud fund.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 820, 32 DCR 7396
as added May 8, 1998, D.C. Law 12-104, § 2(g), 45 DCR 1687
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, §§ 1062, 9004(b), 58 DCR 6226
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 98(a), 59 DCR 6190

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-308.20.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 2-308.20.
1981 Ed., § 1-1188.20.

Short Title

Short title: Section 1061 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided that subtitle F of title I of the act may be cited as “OIG Auditing Reform Amendment Act of 2011”.

Editor's Notes

Section 98(a) of D.C. Law 19-171 amended D.C. Law 19-21, § 9004(b) to repeal D.C. Law 6-85, § 820 instead of D.C. Law 6-85, § 816.